Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 6 General Provisions
Lieutenant did not have a letter from the director of the Arkansas State Police authorizing his activities, but he was working interdiction on the interstate to locate drugs in vehicles as a deputy sheriff commissioned by the county sheriff's department, he produced his identification card showing his commission dates, and he testified that when he discovered defendant appeared to be intoxicated, he notified another lieutenant who was specifically working driving while intoxicated investigations; there was no clear error in the trial court's finding that the lieutenant was acting on behalf of the county when he conducted the traffic stop.Batchelor v. State, 2014 Ark. App. 682, 450 S.W.3d 245 (2014).

Officer held justified in stopping vehicle to investigate reason for slow speed and to determine age of operator. Perez v. State, 260 Ark. 438, 541 S.W.2d 915 (1976).

Circuit court properly granted summary judgment to the Arkansas State Police (ASP) in an action by a towing company and an employee for injunctive and declaratory relief asserting that the ASP policy prohibiting individuals with felony convictions from placement on the ASP Towing Rotation List was illegal under §17-1-103. Plaintiffs'suit was barred by sovereign immunity, because §17-1-103 did not apply to ASP, as ASP did not deal in licensing or regulating the occupation of towing within the meaning of §17-1-103(f), as required for § 17-1-103 to apply; thus, plaintiffs failed to demonstrate that the illegal-act exception to sovereign immunity applied.Steve's Auto Ctr. of Conway, Inc. v. Ark. StatePolice, 2020 Ark. 58, 592 S.W.3d 695 (2020).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a); and substituted “division officer” for “department officer” twice in (b).

Governor and his or her family;

Lieutenant Governor and his or her family;

Governor's Mansion and mansion grounds; and

State Capitol Building and State Capitol grounds.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” three times in (b), and in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in the introductory language of (a), and in (b).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 100, § 1.